runtime/dict/uk_UA.dic
битися/^|w
блякнути/^|w
в'янути/^|w
вбитися/^
ввергтися/^
ввібратися/^
ввігнатися/^
ввіссатися/^
вгрузти/^
вдатися/^
вдітися/^
вдягтися/^
вибитися/^
виблякнути/^
видати/^(
видістатися/^
викиснути/^
вимокти/^
виникнути/^
випочити/^
висісти/^
висохти/^
вистати/^
висякти/^
витиснути/^On
витися/^|w
витягти/^n
вихолонути/^
вичахти/^
вищезнути/^
відбитися/^
відвиснути/^
відгудіти/^
віддатися/^
відібратися/^
відігнатися/^
відідратися/^
відізватися/^
відіпратися/^
відквітнути/^
відлити/^n
відм'якнути/^
відмерзти/^
відпити/^n
відпочити/^
відсісти/^
відстати/^
відтати/^
відтиснутися/^
відтягтися/^
віссати/^
вклякнути/^
влипнути/^
влитися/^
вмовкнути/^
вмолоти/^O
воскреснути/^
впитися/^`
вповитися/^
всістися/^
всохтися/^
встигти/^
встряти/^
втиснутися/^
вторгнутися/^
втягти/^
вщухнути/^
гіркнути/^|w
гнати/^|(
гудіти/^|w
дати/^(
дістати/^
діти/^
добити/^n
довидати/^(
довитися/^
додатися/^
домолотися/^
допитися/^
дослати/Z(^
доссати/^
достатися/^
досягти/^
дотиснути/^n
дотягти/^
дохнути/^|w
забагти/^
забитися/^
заблякти/^
зав'язнути/^
зав'яти/^
завдатися/^
зависнути/^
завитися/^
заглухнути/^
загудіти/^
загуснути/^
задатися/^
задітися/^
зажовкнути/^
заквітнути/^
заклякти/^
залипнути/^
замовкнути/^
замокти/^
занишкнути/^
запити/^n
заподітися/^
запрагти/^
заприсягтися/^
запродатися/^
запухти/^
засісти/^
заслати/Z(^
засмагнути/^
зассати/^
застати/^
застрягти/^
засягти/^
затерпнути/^
затиснутися/^
затухнути/^
затягтися/^
захолонути/^
захрипнути/^
захряснутися/^
заціпнути/^
зачахти/^
зашкарубнути/^
збити/^n
зблиснути/^
зблякнути/^
зватися/^|w
звергтися/^
звикнутися/^
звити/^n
згаснути/^
згуснути/^
здатися/^
здохнути/^
зжухнути/^
зібратися/^
зігнати/^(
зідратися/^
злипнутися/^
злитися/ZM|w^
змерзнути/^
змерзти/^
змеркнути/^
змерхти/^
змовкти/^
змолотися/^
зодягти/^
зостатися/^
зсістися/^
зсохнути/^
зсохти/^
зустріти/^n
квітнути/^|w
клякнути/^|wZ
м'якнути/^|w
меркнути/^|w
мовкнути/^|w
молотися/^|
набитися/^
набрякнути/^
нав'язнути/^
навити/^n
надати/^(
надбити/^n
наддати/^
надігнати/^
надітися/^
надпити/^n
надсістися/^
надягти/^
нам'якнути/^
намерзтися/^
напити/^
напосісти/^
напухнути/^
насісти/^
наслати/Z(^
нассати/^
настати/^
натиснути/^nO
натягти/^
нахолонути/^
недодати/^(
недопити/^n
недопродати/^(
никнути/^|wZ
оббити/^n
обвикнути/^
обвиснути/^
обвитися/^
обдатися/^
обібратися/^
обігнатися/^
обідратися/^
обіпратися/^
облити/^n
обм'якнути/^
обмокнути/Zn^
обрезкнути/^
обсісти/^
обсохнути/^
обтанути/^
обтиснутися/^
обтягтися/^
оглухнути/^
одбитися/^
одібрати/^(
одлити/^n
одпочити/^
одягти/^
озватися/^
оповити/^n
опосісти/^
опухнути/^
осістися/^
ослизнути/^
остатися/^
остогиднути/^
отерпти/^
отягтися/^
охолонути/^
пахнути/^|w
перебитися/^
перевдягтися/^
перевидатися/^
перевити/^n
перегаснути/^
перегудіти/^
передатися/^
передрати/^(
передягти/^
пережовкнути/^
перездатися/^
перезібратися/^
перемерзнути/^
перемолотися/^
переодягтися/^
перепитися/^
переповитися/^
перепочити/^
пересісти/^
пересохнути/^
перестати/^
перестріти/^n
перетиснути/^On
перетрухнути/^
перетягтися/^
перехотіти/^
пити/^|wn
підбитися/^
підвити/^n
піддати/^(
піддягти/^
підібратися/^
підігнатися/^
підіслати/Z(^
підлипнути/^
підлитися/^
підмокнути/^
підпухнути/^
підсохнути/^
підсохти/^
підтанути/^
підтиснутися/^
підтрухнути/^
підтягти/^
побити/^n
побитися/^
побліднути/^
пов'яти/^
повергнути/^nO
повиснути/^
повитися/^
повстати/^
погаснути/^
поглухнути/^
погудіти/^
подати/^(
подіти/^n
подітися/^
подохнути/^
пожухнути/^
позостатися/^
поклякнути/^
померкнути/^
померхти/^
помокнути/^
попити/^n
попобити/^n
поповити/^Z
попомерзнути/^
попопити/^
попоревіти/^
поревіти/^
посісти/^
послабнути/^
посмагнути/^
посохнути/^
посохти/^
постати/^
постатися/^
постигти/^
потати/^
потерпти/^
потиснути/^
потрухнути/^
потухнути/^
потягти/^
похолонути/^
похотіти/^
похрипнути/^
пошерхнути/^
пощезнути/^
прагнути/^|w
прибитися/^
прибліднути/^
прив'янути/^
пригаснути/^
пригіркнути/^
придати/^(
приклякти/^
прилипнути/^
примерзти/^
примерхнути/^
примовкнути/^
принишкнути/^
приодягтися/^
припочити/^
припухнути/^
присістися/^
присохнути/^
присохти/^
приссатися/^
пристанути/^
пристати/^
присягти/^
присягтися/^
притиснути/^On
притихнути/^
притрухнути/^
притухнути/^
притягтися/^
пришерхнути/^
прищухнути/^
пробитися/^
провиснути/^
прогіркнути/^
продати/^(
продатися/^
прожовкнути/^
промерзти/^
промокнути/^
промолоти/^N
пропахти/^
пропити/^n
пропитися/^
просісти/^
просохти/^
простигти/^
простягтися/^
просякти/^
протанути/^
протиснутися/^
протухнути/^
протягти/^
прохолонути/^
прочахти/^
пухнути/^|w
розбити/^n
розбитися/^
розблиснути/^
розверзти/^
розвити/^n
розвитися/^
роздатися/^
роздягти/^
роздягтися/^
розібратися/^
розігнати/^(
розігнатися/^
розідратися/^
розіслати/Z(^
розквітнути/^
розлити/^n
розлитися/^
розм'якнути/^
розмокнути/^
розмокти/^
розмолотися/^
розпитися/^
розповити/^n
розповитися/^
розпродатися/^
розпухнути/^
розревітися/^
розсохтися/^
розстатися/^
розтати/^
розтиснутися/^
розтягти/^
розтягтися/^
самовбитися/^
сісти/^
скиснути/^
скригнути/^
слабнути/^|w
слати/Z|w^
слизнути/^Z
сліпнути/^|w
сохнути/^|w
спертися/^
спити/^n
спитися/^
сповитися/^
сподвигнути/^
спочити/^
спродати/^(
спродатися/^
спухнути/^
ссати/^|
станути/^
стати/^
стверднути/^
стерпнути/^
стерти/^n
стигнути/^|w
стиснути/^On
стиснутися/^
стріти/^
стрітися/^
стухнути/^
стягтися/^
схолонути/^
схотіти/^
схуднути/^
танути/^|w
тверднути/^|w
тиснути/^|wnO
тиснутися/^|
тихнути/^|w
тягти/^|
тягтися/^|
убити/^n
увергнути/^n
увергнутися/^
увергтися/^
увити/^n
увитися/^
увібрати/^(
увігнати/^(
увігнатися/^
увіссати/^
угрузти/^
удати/^
удатися/^
удягтися/^
укиснути/^
уклякти/^
умерзнути/^
умовкнути/^
умокнути/^n
упити/^`
упитися/^`
уповити/^n
усістися/^
услати/^(
услатися/^
устати/^
устигти/^
устрягти/^
утиснути/^On
утиснутися/^
утихнути/^
утягтися/^
ущухнути/^
хлянути/^|
холонути/^|w
хотіти/^|w
худнути/^|w
шерхнути/^
шкарубнути/^|w
щезнути/^
